Utah statutes.
9-9-101.   Title -- Definitions.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Utah Division of Indian Affairs Act."

(2) (a)  As used in this chapter, "division" means the Utah Division of Indian Affairs created in Section 9-9-102.

(b)  As used in this part, "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community of Indians that is recognized as eligible for the special programs and services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians.

